Washington statutes.
RCW 35.18.290

Abandonment of council-manager plan.

Any city or town which has operated under the council-manager plan for more than six years may abandon such organization and accept the provisions of the general laws then applicable to municipalities upon the petition of not less than twenty percent of the registered voters therein, without changing its classification unless it desires to do so.

[ 1965 ex.s. c 47 s 4; 1965 c 7 s 35.18.290. Prior: 1943 c 271 s 22, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9198-31, part.]